Oklahoma, session 2025, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1280.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1280.1.
POSSESSION OF FIREARM ON SCHOOL PROPERTY
A. It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her
possession on any public or private school property or while in any
school bus or vehicle used by any school for transportation of
students or teachers any firearm or weapon designated in Section

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB84 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1272 of this title, except as provided in subsection C of this
section or as otherwise authorized by law.
B. For purposes of this section:
1. “School property” means any publicly owned property held for
purposes of elementary, secondary, or vocational-technical
education, and shall not include property owned by public school
districts or where such property is leased or rented to an
individual or corporation and used for purposes other than
educational;
2. “Private school” means a school that offers a course of
instruction for students in one or more grades from prekindergarten
through grade twelve and is not operated by a governmental entity;
and
3. “Motor vehicle” means any automobile, truck, minivan, or
sports utility vehicle.
C. Firearms and weapons are allowed on school property and
deemed not in violation of subsection A of this section as follows:
1. A gun or knife designed for hunting or fishing purposes kept
in a privately owned vehicle and properly displayed or stored as
required by law, provided such vehicle containing said gun or knife
is driven onto school property only to transport a student to and
from school and such vehicle does not remain unattended on school
property;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB84 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. A gun firearm or knife used for the purposes of
participating in the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife Conservation
certified hunter training education course or any other hunting,
fishing, safety, or firearms training courses, or a recognized
firearms sports event, team shooting program, or competition, or
living history reenactment, provided the course or event is approved
by the principal or chief administrator of the school where the
course or event is offered, and provided the weapon is properly
displayed or stored as required by law pending participation in the
course, event, program, or competition;
3. 2. Weapons A firearm or weapon in the possession of any
peace officer or other person authorized by law to possess a firearm
or weapon in the performance of his or her duties and
responsibilities;
4. 3. A concealed or unconcealed firearm or weapon carried onto
private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any
private school for transportation of students or teachers by a
person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,
provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the
private school that authorizes the possession of a firearm or weapon
on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by a
private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school that
adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a firearm or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB84 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

weap on on private school property, a school bus, or a vehicle used
by the private school shall be immune from and not subject to
liability for any injuries arising from the adoption of the policy.
The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to claims pursuant
to the Administrative Workers’ Compensation Code Act;
5. 4. A gun firearm, knife, bayonet, or other weapon in the
possession of a member of a veterans group, the national guard
National Guard, active military, the Reserve Officers’ Training
Corps (ROTC), or Junior ROTC, in order to participate in a ceremony,
assembly, or educational program approved by the principal or chief
administrator of a school or school district where the ceremony,
assembly, or educational program is being held; provided, however,
the gun firearm or other weapon that uses projectiles is not loaded
and is inoperable at all times while on school property;
6. 5. A handgun firearm carried in a privately owned motor
vehicle pursuant to a valid handgun license authorized by the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act onto property set aside
by a public or private elementary or secondary school for the use or
parking of any vehicle; provided, however, said handgun the firearm
shall be stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when
the motor vehicle is left unattended on school property; and
7. 6. A handgun carried onto public school property by school
personnel who have been designated by the board of education,
provided such personnel either:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB84 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. possess a valid armed security guard license as
provided for in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, or
b. hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as
provided for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes,
if a policy has been adopted by the board of education of the school
district that authorizes the carrying of a handgun onto public
school property by such personnel. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to restrict authority granted elsewhere in law to carry
firearms.
D. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB84 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)